Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-138
Refunding warrants; issuance authorized; conditions.

Any issuer, except a sanitary and improvement district, which has issued outstanding warrants may issue refunding warrants with which to pay and redeem all or any part of the outstanding warrants, including interest to accrue and become payable on the warrants being refunded. Such refunding warrants may be issued on such terms and conditions and sold at such prices as the governing body of the issuer shall determine. Refunding warrants shall be payable from the same sources as would have been available for payment of the warrants being refunded.

Laws 1983, LB 421, § 5.